California, session 20252026, AB261.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51178 of the Government Code is amended to read:51178. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall identify areas in the state as moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones based on consistent statewide criteria and based on the severity of fire hazard that is expected to prevail in those areas. Moderate, high, and very high fire hazard severity zones shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors including areas where winds have been identified by the Office of the State Fire Marshal as a major cause of wildfire spread. Fire hazard severity zones shall not be based on risk mitigation activities.(b) (1) In periods between the State Fire Marshal’s review of areas of the state for recommendations regarding an area’s fire hazard severity zone, pursuant to Section 51181, the State Fire Marshal may confer with entities, including, but not limited to, public agencies, tribes, nonprofit organizations, project applicants, members of the public, and others, on actions that may impact the degree of fire hazard in an area or the area’s recommended fire hazard severity zone designation. The State Fire Marshal may provide a written response to an entity on actions that may impact the degree of fire hazard.(2) In periods between the State Fire Marshal’s review of areas of the state for recommendations regarding an area’s fire hazard severity zone, pursuant to Section 51181, entities, including, but not limited to, public agencies, tribes, nonprofit organizations, project applicants, members of the public, and others, may provide information to the State Fire Marshal on wildfire safety improvements and other actions the entity has taken or plans to take, and any information submitted to or by the department pursuant to Section 4291.5 of the Public Resources Code, before the next review that may impact the degree of fire hazard in an area or the area’s fire hazard severity zone designation. The State Fire Marshal, according to the State Fire Marshal’s discretion, may consider this information in the next review.(3) Any letters provided by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (1) and any documentation provided to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be posted on the State Fire Marshal’s internet website in a manner that is easily accessible.(4) The State Fire Marshal may require a fee from an entity that confers with the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (1) or provides information to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (2) to cover the State Fire Marshal’s costs associated with this subdivision.SEC. 2. Section 4202 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4202. The State Fire Marshal shall classify lands within state responsibility areas into fire hazard severity zones. Each zone shall embrace relatively homogeneous lands and shall be based on fuel loading, slope, fire weather, and other relevant factors present, including areas where winds have been identified by the department as a major cause of wildfire spread. Fire hazard severity zones shall not be based on risk mitigation activities.SEC. 2.SEC. 3. Section 4204 of the Public Resources Code is amended to read:4204. (a) The State Fire Marshal shall periodically review zones designated and rated pursuant to this article and, as necessary, shall revise zones or their ratings or repeal the designation of zones. Any revision of a zone or its rating or any repeal of a zone shall conform to the requirements of Section 4203. In addition, the revision or repeal of a zone may be petitioned pursuant to Sections 11340.6 and 11340.7 of the Government Code.(b) (1) In periods between the State Fire Marshal’s review of areas of the state regarding an area’s fire hazard severity zone designation, the State Fire Marshal may confer with entities, including, but not limited to, public agencies, tribes, nonprofit organizations, project applicants, members of the public, and others, on actions that may impact the degree of fire hazard in an area or the area’s recommended fire hazard severity zone designation. The State Fire Marshal may provide a written response to an entity on actions that may impact the degree of fire hazard.(2) In periods between the State Fire Marshal’s review of areas of the state regarding an area’s fire hazard severity zone, entities, including, but not limited to, public agencies, tribes, nonprofit organizations, project applicants, members of the public, and others, may provide information to the State Fire Marshal on wildfire safety improvements and other actions the entity has taken or plans to take, and any information submitted to or by the department pursuant to Section 4291.5, before the next review that may impact the degree of fire hazard in an area or the area’s fire hazard severity zone designation. The State Fire Marshal, according to the State Fire Marshal’s discretion, may consider this information in the next review.(3) Any letters provided by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (1) and any documentation provided to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (2) shall be posted on the State Fire Marshal’s internet website in a manner that is easily accessible.(4) The State Fire Marshal may require a fee from an entity that confers with the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (1) or provides information to the State Fire Marshal pursuant to paragraph (2) to cover the State Fire Marshal’s costs associated with this subdivision.